North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Article 72. Nonpoint Source Pollution
Control Program.

§ 106-850.
Agriculture cost share program.

There is created the Agriculture Cost Share Program for Nonpoint Source Pollution Control. The program shall be created, implemented, and supervised by the Soil and Water Conservation Commission.

The program shall be subject to the following requirements and limitations:

The purpose of the program shall be to reduce the input of agricultural nonpoint source pollution into the watercourses of the State.

The program shall include the entire State.

Subject to subdivision (7) of this subsection, priority designations for inclusions in the program shall be under the authority of the Soil and Water Conservation Commission. The Soil and Water Conservation Commission shall retain the authority to allocate the cost share funds.

Areas shall be included in the program as the funds are appropriated and the technical assistance becomes available from the local Soil and Water Conservation District.

Funding may be provided to assist practices including conservation tillage, diversions, filter strips, field borders, critical area plantings, sedimentation control structures, sod-based rotations, grassed waterways, strip-cropping, terraces, cropland conversion to permanent vegetation, grade control structures, water control structures, closure of lagoons, emergency spillways, riparian buffers or equivalent controls, odor control best management practices, insect control best management practices, and animal waste management systems and application. Funding for animal waste management shall be allocated for practices in river basins such that the funds will have the greatest impact in improving water quality.

Except as provided in subdivision (8) of this subsection, State funding shall be limited to seventy-five percent (75%) of the average cost for each practice with the assisted farmer providing twenty-five percent (25%) of the cost, which may include in-kind support of the practice, with a maximum of seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) per year to each applicant.

Priority designation for inclusion in the program for State funding shall be given to projects that improve water quality. To be eligible for cost share funds under this subdivision, a project shall be evaluated before funding is awarded and after the project is completed to determine the impact on water quality.

For practices that are eligible for funding from the federal Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program, State funding from the program shall be limited to seventy-five percent (75%) of the average cost of each practice, with the remainder paid from funding from the Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program, other available federal funds, other State funds, or the assisted farmer, whose contribution may include in-kind support of the practice. This subdivision is subject to subdivision (9) of this subsection.

When the applicant is either (i) a limited-resource farmer, (ii) a beginning farmer, or (iii) a person farming land that is located in an enhanced voluntary agricultural district and is subject to a conservation agreement under

G.S. 106-743.2

that remains in effect, State funding shall be limited to ninety percent (90%) of the average cost for each practice with the assisted farmer providing ten percent (10%) of the cost, which may include in-kind support of the practice, with a maximum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per year to each applicant. The following definitions apply in this subdivision:

Beginning farmer. — A farmer who has not operated a farm or who has operated a farm for not more than 10 years and who will materially and substantially participate in the operation of the farm.

Enhanced voluntary agricultural district. — A district established by a county or a city by ordinance under Part 3 of Article 61 of this Chapter.

Limited-resource farmer. — A farmer with direct and indirect annual gross farm sales that do not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) and with an adjusted household income in each of the previous two years that is at or below the greater of the county median household income, as determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, or two times the national poverty level based on the federal poverty guidelines established by the United States Department of Health and Human Services and revised each April 1.

Materially and substantially participate.

In the case of an individual, for the individual, including members of the immediate family of the individual, to provide substantial day-to-day labor and management of the farm, consistent with the practices in the county in which the farm is located.

In the case of an entity, for all members of the entity, to participate in the operation of the farm, with some members providing management and some members providing labor and management necessary for day-to-day activities such that if the members did not provide the management and labor, the operation of the farm would be seriously impaired.

To be eligible for cost share funds under this program, each applicant must establish that the applicant meets the definition of a bona fide farm as described by G.S. 153A-340(b)(2).

In extraordinary circumstances, the Commission may permit an applicant to establish that he or she is engaged in farming with an alternate form of documentation if the farm has a conservation plan that meets the statutory purposes of the program.

The program shall be reviewed, prior to implementation, by the Committee created by

G.S. 106-852

. The Technical Review Committee shall meet quarterly to review the progress of this program.

State funds for the program shall remain available until expended for the program.

The Soil and Water Conservation Commission shall report on or before January 31 of each year to the Environmental Review Commission, the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, and the Fiscal Research Division. This report shall include a list of projects that received State funding pursuant to the program, the results of the evaluations conducted pursuant to subdivision (7) of subsection (b) of this section, findings regarding the effectiveness of each of these projects to accomplish its primary purpose, and any recommendations to assure that State funding is used in the most cost-effective manner and accomplishes the greatest improvement in water quality. This report shall be submitted to the Environmental Review Commission and the Fiscal Research Division with the reports required by G.S. 106-860(e) and G.S. 139-60(d) as a single report.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1014, s. 149(a); 1987, c. 827, s. 154; c. 830, s. 102; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 626, ss. 9, 10; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 27.22(a), (b); 1997-496, s. 15; 1998-221, s. 3.1; 2002-165, s. 2.18; 2003-284, s. 11.6; 2004-124, s. 12.6; 2005-390, s. 8; 2007-495, s. 18; 2011-145, ss. 13.22A(a), (t)-(w), 13.23A(a); 2011-391, s. 32; 2012-142, s. 11.2A(a); 2015-263, s. 37(a); 2017-10, s. 4.18(a); 2021-78, s. 13A.

Cross References.

As to moratorium on the construction or expansion of swine farms or lagoons or animal waste management systems for swine farms, established by Session Laws 1997-458, ss. 1.1 and 1.2, as amended by Session Laws 1998-188, ss. 2 and 3, by Session Laws 1999-329, ss. 2.1 and 2.2, by Session Laws 2001-254, ss. 1 and 2, and by Session Laws 2003-266, ss. 1 and 2, see the Editor’s notes following

G.S. 143-215.10

A.

Agricultural Drought Response Cost Share Program.

Session Laws 2008-107, s. 12.4, provides: “(a) Agricultural Drought Response Cost Share Program. — The Agricultural Drought Response Cost Share Program is established. The Program shall provide cost share funds to assist North Carolina farmers who suffered damage from the severe and extreme drought conditions in North Carolina in 2007. These cost share funds shall be used to assist farmers with the following projects:

“(1) To redrill damaged wells or to drill new wells to be used as a water supply for livestock or for irrigation.

“(2) To renovate damaged or inadequate farm ponds or construct new farm ponds to be used as a water supply for livestock or for irrigation.

“(3) To renovate pastures depleted by the 2007 drought.

“(b) Program Administration. — The Program shall be implemented and supervised by the Soil and Water Conservation Commission through the Agriculture Cost Share Program for Nonpoint Source Pollution Control. The Commission shall administer this Program as provided in this section and in Part 9 of Article 21 of Chapter 143 [now Article 72 of Chapter 106] of the General Statutes.

“(c) Program Functions. — Under the Agricultural Drought Response Cost Share Program, the Division shall:

“(1) Within funds available for this Program, provide cost share funds subject to all of the following limitations and requirements:

“a. Except as provided in G.S. 143-215.74(b)(9) [now G.S. 106-850(b)(9)], State funding shall be limited to:

“1. Seventy-five percent (75%) of the average cost for each project with the assisted person providing twenty-five percent (25%) of the project cost, which may include in-kind support of the project.

“2. A maximum of seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) per year to each applicant.

“b. Applicants shall be limited to farmers who have an adjusted gross income in each of the previous two years that is at or below two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), unless at least seventy-five percent (75%) of this adjusted gross income is derived directly from farming, ranching, or forestry operations.

“c. To be eligible for cost share funds under subdivision (1) or subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of this section, applicants must demonstrate that their existing water supplies are insufficient to provide reliable water to meet current needs for livestock watering or irrigation.

“d. Applicants may apply for cost share funds for projects under subsection (a) of this section that were installed as of August 1, 2007, so long as the costs of installation are documented to the satisfaction of the Commission.

“e. The requirements and limitations under subdivisions (1), (2), (5), and (8) of subsection (b) of G.S. 143-215.74 [now

G.S. 106-850

] do not apply. All other limitations and requirements set out in Part 9 of Article 21 of Chapter 143 [now Article 72 of Chapter 106] of the General Statutes, as modified by this section, apply.

“(2) Establish criteria to prioritize the redrilling of damaged wells and the drilling of new wells, the renovation of damaged or inadequate farm ponds and the construction of new farm ponds, and the renovation of pastures depleted by the drought.

“(3) Establish criteria for the selection of applicants who are eligible for participation in the Program.

“(4) Develop a process for soliciting and reviewing applications and for selecting farmers to participate in the Program.

“(5) Investigate and pursue other funding sources to supplement State funds, including federal, local, and private funding sources.

“(6) Provide technical assistance to participating persons to assist with the projects that are eligible for cost share funds under subsection (a) of this section and to facilitate the timely transfer of technology among participating persons.

“(d) Report. — No later than 31 January of each year, the Division shall prepare a comprehensive report on the implementation of subsections (a) through (c) of this section. The report shall be submitted to the Environmental Review Commission as a part of the report required by G.S. 143-215.74(e) [now G.S. 106-850(e)]. The first report required by this subsection shall be submitted to the Environmental Review Commission no later than 31 January 2009.

“(e) Program Funds. — The Soil and Water Conservation Commission may use up to one hundred fifteen thousand dollars ($115,000) of the funds appropriated in this act to the Department of Environment and Natural Resources for the 2008-2009 fiscal year to be used for the Agricultural Drought Response Cost Share Program for the Division of Soil and Water Conservation and for the Soil and Water Conservation Districts for the costs of providing engineering assistance, providing technical assistance, and administering the Program. Further, twenty-five percent (25%) of the remaining funds shall not be allocated during the initial funding cycle, but shall be retained to be allocated by the Commission consistent with the limitations under this section, for the purposes under this section, and to address future drought emergencies or to allocate to farmers who received cost share funds under this section who need additional funds to achieve the purpose of the initial cost share disbursement.”

Session Laws 2007-523, s. 2(a)-(f), provides: “(a) Definitions. — The definitions set out in

G.S. 143-215.10

I(a), as enacted by Section 1 of this act, apply to this section. As used in this section, an ‘innovative animal waste management system’ means an animal waste management system that serves a swine farm that may be permitted under

G.S. 143-215.10

I(b), as enacted by Section 1 of this act.

“(b) Lagoon Conversion Program. — The Lagoon Conversion Program is hereby established. The Program shall provide grants to assist in the conversion of animal waste management systems that serve swine farms in operation on or before 1 September 2007 that employ anaerobic lagoons as the primary method of treatment to innovative animal waste management systems. Grants under the Program may also be used to:

“(1) Assist in the closure of sprayfield and lagoon systems that are replaced by innovative animal waste management systems if the closure is performed in accordance with applicable federal and State laws, regulations, and rules.

“(2) Establish centralized waste collection and treatment systems that serve innovative animal waste management systems.

“(c) Program Administration. — The Program shall be administered by the Division of Soil and Water Conservation in the Department of Environment and Natural Resources [now Division of Soil and Water Conservation of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services] through the Agriculture Cost Share Program for Nonpoint Source Pollution Control established pursuant to G.S. 143-215.74 [now

G.S. 106-850

]. The Division shall administer the Program as provided in this section and Part 9 of Article 21 of Chapter 143 [now Article 72 of Chapter 106] of the General Statutes.

“(d) Program Functions. — Under the Lagoon Conversion Program, the Division of Soil and Water Conservation in the Department of Environment and Natural Resources [now Division of Soil and Water Conservation of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services], through the Agriculture Cost Share Program for Nonpoint Source Pollution Control, shall:

“(1) Within funds available to the Swine Farm Waste Management System Conversion Account established by Section 3 of this act, provide grants subject to all of the following limitations and requirements:

“a. For grants approved on or before 30 June 2012, State funding shall be limited to:

“1. Ninety percent (90%) of the average cost for each practice with the assisted person providing ten percent (10%) of the cost, which may include in-kind support of the practice.

“2. A maximum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) per year to each applicant.

“b. For grants approved on or after 1 July 2012 and on or before 30 June 2017, State funding shall be limited to:

“1. Eighty percent (80%) of the average cost for each practice with the assisted person providing twenty percent (20%) of the cost, which may include in-kind support of the practice.

“2. A maximum of four hundred fifty thousand dollars ($450,000) per year to each applicant.

“c. For grants approved on or after 1 July 2017, State funding shall be limited to:

“1. Seventy-five percent (75%) of the average cost for each practice with the assisted person providing twenty-five percent (25%) of the cost, which may include in-kind support of the practice.

“2. A maximum of four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) per year to each applicant.

“d. All other limitations and requirements set out in Part 9 of Article 21 of Chapter 143 [now Article 72 of Chapter 106] of the General Statutes, as modified by this section.

“(2) Establish criteria to prioritize the installation of innovative animal waste management systems that serve swine farms. Priority shall be given to systems that are affordable, easily maintained, produce marketable by-products, reduce or eliminate the emission of ammonia and greenhouse gases, and are capable of being connected to a centralized waste collection and treatment.

“(3) Establish criteria for the selection of applicants who are eligible for participation in the Program. Priority shall be given to applicants whose participation in the Program will result in the removal of animal waste management systems from floodplains; who have substantially complied with federal and State laws, regulations, and rules for the protection of the environment, natural resources, and public health; and who have a limited ability to pay for or finance an innovative swine waste management system through private or cooperative credit at reasonable rates and terms.

“(4) Develop a process for soliciting and reviewing applications and for selecting persons to participate in the Program.

“(5) Investigate and pursue other funding sources to supplement State funds, including federal, local, and private funding sources.

“(6) Provide technical assistance to participating persons to assist with modifications of waste management systems and facilitate the timely transfer of technology among participating persons.

“(e) Advisory Committee. — The Director of the Division of Soil and Water Conservation may establish an advisory committee to assist the Division with the implementation of this act. If the Director establishes an advisory committee, the Director may direct the advisory committee to evaluate:

“(1) Markets for by-products derived from swine waste and make recommendations for development of the markets, including identification of regulatory obstacles.

“(2) Methods to encourage growers, integrators, and electric power suppliers to cooperate in the production and use of renewable energy or other marketable by-products derived from swine waste, including an examination of tax incentives, carbon sequestration credits, and trading mechanisms.

“(f) Report. — No later than 1 October of each year, the Division of Soil and Water Conservation in the Department of Environment and Natural Resources [now Division of Soil and Water Conservation of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services] shall prepare a comprehensive report on the implementation of Sections 1, 2, and 3 of this act. The report shall be submitted to the Environmental Review Commission as a part of the report required by

G.S. 143-215.10

M. The first report required by this subsection shall be submitted to the Environmental Review Commission no later than 1 October 2008.”

Session Laws 2007-523, s. 3, provides: “Account. — There is hereby established the Swine Farm Waste Management System Conversion Account within the Division of Soil and Water Conservation of the Department of Environment and Natural Resources [now Division of Soil and Water Conservation of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services]. Funds in the Account shall be used only as provided in subsection (b) of Section 2 of this act. The Account shall consist of funds appropriated to the Account by the General Assembly; any federal funds available for this purpose; and any grants, gifts, or contributions to the State for this purpose. Funds in the Account shall not revert.”

§ 106-851.
Program participation.

Participation in the program shall be voluntary.

All participants in the program shall be required to match State funds at the same rate, and assistance from the Agriculture Extension Service at North Carolina State University shall also be used.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1014, s. 149(a); 2011-145, s. 13.22A(t).

§ 106-852.
Committee established.

Detailed plans for implementing the program shall be reviewed and suggested changes and reasons therefor shall be given by a committee consisting of the Master of the North Carolina State Grange, President of the North Carolina Farm Bureau Federation, the North Carolina Commissioner of Agriculture, the Dean of the School of Agriculture and Life Sciences at North Carolina State University, the Dean of the School of Agriculture at North Carolina Agricultural and Technical State University, the Chairman of the State Soil and Water Conservation Commission, the President of the North Carolina Association of Soil and Water Conservation Districts, the Executive Director of the Wildlife Resources Commission or a designee, and the Director of the Division of Marine Fisheries or a designee. The committee shall review the program prior to expenditure of any funds for the program. Certification documenting the committee’s review of the program shall be made in writing to the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the President of the Senate, the Chairmen of the Appropriations Committees of the Senate and the House of Representatives, the Director of the Fiscal Research Division of the Legislative Services Office, and the Legislative Library.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1014, s. 149(a); 1989, c. 500, s. 117; 1993, c. 321, s. 261; 2011-145, s. 13.22A(t).

§§ 106-853 through 106-859.

Reserved for future codification purposes.